Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.160

Cancellation of letters of administration.

The court appointing any personal representative shall have authority for any cause deemed sufficient, to cancel and annul such letters and appoint other personal representatives in the place of those removed.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.160. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 52; RRS s 1422.]

NOTES:

Revocation of letters—Causes: RCW 11.28.250.